Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Dam Safety Act.
§ 10.1-609.1.
Installation of IFLOWS gauges.

A soil and water conservation district responsible for the maintenance and operation of a flood control dam shall be permitted to install Integrated Flood Observing and Warning Systems (IFLOWS) gauges and associated equipment, or a device approved by the Department of Emergency Management, while awaiting funds to make structural modifications to correct emergency spillway capacity deficiencies in the dam, identified by the Board in a report issued pursuant to §

10.1-609

, when any of the following conditions exist: (i) funds are not available to make such structural modifications to the dam, (ii) the completion of such structural modifications requires the acquisition of additional property or easements by exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (iii) funds for the IFLOWS equipment or an equivalent device have been appropriated by the General Assembly. Installation of IFLOWS gauges or similar devices shall not affect the regulated status of the dam under the Virginia Dam Safety Act (§

10.1-604

et seq.).
Any IFLOWS gauges and associated equipment shall be installed in a manner approved by the Department of Emergency Management and shall be operated and maintained by the Department of Emergency Management.

History.

1993, c. 709.

§ 10.1-609.2.
Prohibited vegetation; certain wetland vegetation allowed.

Dam owners shall not permit the growth of trees and other woody vegetation and shall remove any such vegetation from the slopes and crest of embankments and the emergency spillway area and within a distance of 25 feet from the toe of the embankment and abutments of the dam.

The provisions of subsection A shall not apply to wetland vegetation, including woody shrubs, trees, and plants, that is growing on a permanent aquatic or safety bench that has been added to the upstream embankment slope of a regulated impounding structure if such vegetation is associated with a wetland mitigation bank or in-lieu fee site that (i) has been approved by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers and the Department of Environmental Quality and (ii) is the subject of a restrictive covenant or other permanent instrument that specifically protects the particular wetland vegetation from removal and is recorded among the land records of the locality. However, the Department may require the dam owner to remove trees by flush cutting unless the Department determines on the basis of site-specific information that the grubbing of roots is necessary to protect the integrity of the dam in a particular case.

Owners failing to maintain their dam in accordance with this section shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to §

10.1-613

.

History.

2006, c. 30; 2019, c. 148.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 148 designated the existing provisions as subsections A and C, and added subsection B.

§ 10.1-610.
Right of entry.

The Board and its agents and employees shall have the right to enter any property at reasonable times and under reasonable circumstances to perform such inspections and tests or to take such other actions it deems necessary to fulfill its responsibilities under this article, including the inspection of dams that may be subject to this article, provided that the Board or its agents or employees make a reasonable effort to obtain the consent of the owner of the land prior to entry.

If entry is denied, the Board or its designated agents or employees may make an affidavit under oath before any magistrate whose territorial jurisdiction encompasses the property to be inspected or entered for a warrant authorizing such investigation, tests or other actions. Such warrant shall issue if the magistrate finds probable cause to believe that there is a dam on such property which is not known to be safe. After issuing a warrant under this section, the magistrate shall file the affidavit in the manner prescribed by §

19.2-54

. After executing the warrant, the Board or its designated agents or employees shall return the warrant to the clerk of the circuit court of the city or county wherein the investigation was made.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.7; 1988, c. 891; 2005, c. 117; 2014, c. 354.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by c. 117 rewrote the first sentence and inserted “or its designated agents or employees” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 354 designated the existing provisions as subsections A and B; in subsection B substituted “make an affidavit under oath before” for “apply to,” and added the last two sentences.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-121. Affidavit for Dam Inspection Warrant; No. 9-122. Dam Inspection Warrant.

§ 10.1-610.1.
Monitoring progress of work.

During the maintenance, construction, or alteration of any dam or reservoir, the Department shall make periodic inspections for the purpose of securing conformity with the approved plans and specifications. The Department shall require the owner to perform at his expense such work or tests as necessary to obtain information sufficient to enable the Department to determine whether conformity with the approved plans and specifications is being secured.

If, after any inspections, investigations, or examinations, or at any time as the work progresses, or at any time prior to issuance of a certificate of approval, it is found by the Director that project modifications or changes are necessary to ensure conformity with the approved plans and specifications, the Director may issue an administrative order to the owner to comply with the plans and specifications. Within 15 calendar days after being served by personal service or by mail with a copy of an order issued pursuant to this section, any owner shall have the right to petition the Board for a hearing. A timely filed petition shall stay the effect of the administrative order. The hearing shall be conducted before the Board or a designated member of the Board pursuant to § 2.2-4019. The Board shall have the authority to affirm, modify, amend, or cancel the administrative order. Any owner aggrieved by a decision of the Board after a hearing shall have the right to judicial review of the final Board decision pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Following the Board hearing, subject to judicial review of the final decision of the Board, if conditions are revealed that will not permit the construction of a safe dam or reservoir, the certificate of approval may be revoked. As part of the revocation, the Board may compel the owner to remove the incomplete structure sufficiently to eliminate any safety hazard to life or property.

History.

2006, c. 30.

§ 10.1-611.
Dam safety coordination.

The Board shall coordinate all impoundment safety activities in the Commonwealth, which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the maintenance of an inventory of all impoundment structures and of all other similar structures that are not regulated under this article to the extent the Board deems necessary; (ii) the maintenance of a repository for record drawings of all such structures to the extent the Board deems necessary; (iii) the maintenance of an inventory of safety inspection reports for each such structure to the extent the Board deems necessary; and (iv) the maintenance of a secondary repository for all dam safety emergency action plans, which are primarily filed with the Department of Emergency Management. The Board shall consult with the Department of Emergency Management in its planning for impoundment safety and shall provide technical assistance in the preparation, updating, and execution of dam safety emergency action plans. It shall establish uniform maintenance-of-records requirements and uniform inspection standards to be applied to all impounding structures in the Commonwealth and to be recommended for all other similar structures. It may inspect or cause to be inspected state-owned or state-licensed dams on a cost-reimbursable basis at the request of the state agency owning the state-owned dam or of the licensor of the state-licensed dam.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.8; 1986, c. 9; 1988, c. 891; 2012, cc. 70, 230.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 70 and 230 are identical, and substituted “that” for “which” in clause (i) in the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “consult with the Department of Emergency Management in its planning for impoundment safety and shall” near the beginning and substituted “dam safety emergency action plans” for “such plans” at the end and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-611.1.
Soil and Water Conservation District Dam Maintenance, Repair, and Rehabilitation Fund established; Department to manage; Board to expend moneys; regulations.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Soil and Water Conservation District Dam Maintenance, Repair, and Rehabilitation Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be comprised of moneys appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly and any other moneys designated for deposit to the Fund from any source, public or private. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and the moneys shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for (i) the maintenance and repair of any dams owned by soil and water conservation districts and (ii) the rehabilitation and major repair of Class I and Class II dams owned by soil and water conservation districts, in order to bring such dams into compliance with regulations promulgated pursuant to Article 2 (§

10.1-604

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of this title. Expenditures from the Fund made under clause (ii) of this subsection may include, but are not limited to, the following repairs to the infrastructure of a dam: increasing the height of a dam, modifying the spillway, and reducing wave erosion of a dam’s inside face. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

The Fund shall be administered and managed by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, subject to the right of the Board, following consultation with the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to direct the distribution of moneys in the Fund to particular soil and water conservation districts.

The Board is authorized to promulgate regulations for the proper administration of the Fund. Such regulations may include, but are not limited to, the type and amount of financial assistance, the terms and conditions of the assistance, and project eligibility criteria.

History.

1997, c. 356; 2000, cc. 23, 205.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 23 and 205 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “Maintenance, Repair, and Rehabilitation” for “Maintenance and Small Repair Fund” in the first sentence, in the sixth sentence added the clause (i) designation preceding “the maintenance and repair of,” inserted “any” thereafter and added clause (ii), and added the seventh sentence; and in subsection B, inserted “water” preceding “conservation districts.”

§ 10.1-612.
Technical Advisory Committee.

The Board shall establish an Impoundment Safety Technical Advisory Committee to provide technical review. The Committee may make recommendations to the Board.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.9; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-612.1.
Temporary stop work order; hearing; injunctive relief.

The Director may issue a temporary stop work order on a construction or alteration project if he finds that an owner is constructing or altering a dam without having first obtained the necessary certificate of approval, or if the activities are not in accordance with approved plans and specifications. The order shall include written notice to the owner of the date, time, and location where the owner may appear at a hearing before the Board or a designated member thereof pursuant to § 2.2-4019 to show cause why the temporary order should be vacated. The hearing shall be held within 15 calendar days of the date of the order, unless the owner consents to a longer period.

Following the hearing, the Board may affirm or cancel the temporary order and may issue a final order directing that immediate steps be taken to abate or ameliorate any harm or damage arising from the violation. The owner may seek judicial review of the final decision of the Board pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

If the violation continues after the Board has issued a final decision and order pursuant to subsection B or a temporary order issued by the Director pursuant to subsection A, the Board may apply for an injunction from the appropriate court. A decision to seek injunctive relief does not preclude other forms of relief, enforcement, or penalties against the owner.

History.

2006, c. 30.

§ 10.1-613.
Enforcement.

Any person or legal entity failing or refusing to comply with an order issued pursuant to this article may be compelled to comply with the order in a proceeding instituted in any appropriate court by the Board. The Board shall bring suit in the name of the Commonwealth in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the unlawful construction, modification, operation, or maintenance of any dam regulated under this article. Such court may require the removal or modification of any such dam by mandatory injunction. If the court orders the removal of the dam, the owner shall be required to bear the expenses of such removal.

Should the Board be required to implement and carry out the action, the Board shall charge the owner for any expenses associated with the action, and if the repayment is not made within 90 days after written demand, the Board may bring an action in the proper court to recover this expense. The Board shall file an action in the court having jurisdiction over any owner or the owner’s property for the recovery of such costs. A lien in the amount of such costs shall be automatically created on all property owned by any such owner at or proximate to such dam or reservoir.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.10; 1988, c. 891; 2006, c. 30.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 30 added the last three sentences in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

§ 10.1-613.1.
Criminal penalties.

It is unlawful for any owner to knowingly:

Operate, construct, or alter a dam without an approval as provided in this article;

Violate the terms of an approval, order, regulation, or requirement of the Board or Director under this article; or

Obstruct, hinder, or prevent the Board or its designated agents or employees from performing duties under this article.A violation of any provision of this subsection or this article is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Each day that any such violation occurs after notice of the original violation is served upon the violator by the Board or its designated agents or employees by registered mail shall constitute a separate offense. Upon conviction, the violator is subject to a fine not exceeding $500 per day for each day of the offense, not to exceed a total fine of $25,000, with costs imposed at the discretion of the court. In determining the amount of the penalty, the appropriate court shall consider the degree of harm to the public; whether the violation was knowing or willful; the past conduct of the defendant; whether the defendant should have been on notice of the violation; whether the defendant has taken steps to cease, remove, or mitigate the violation; and any other relevant information.

History.

2006, c. 30.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-613.2.
Civil penalties.

In addition to or in lieu of any other forfeitures, remedies, or penalties authorized by law or regulations, any owner violating any provision of this article may be assessed a civil penalty of up to $500 per day by the Board not to exceed a maximum of $25,000.

In setting the civil penalty amount, the Board shall consider (i) the nature, duration, and number of previous instances of failure by the owner to comply with requirements of law relating to dam safety and the requirements of Board regulations and orders; (ii) the efforts of the owner to correct deficiencies or other instances of failure to comply with the requirements of law relating to dam safety and the requirements of Board regulations and orders that are the subject of the proposed penalty; (iii) the cost of carrying out actions required to meet the requirements of law and Board regulations and orders; (iv) the hazard classification of the dam; and (v) other factors deemed appropriate by the Board.

All civil penalties will be assessed by written penalty notice from the Board and given by certified mail or personal service. The notice shall state the specific reasons for the penalty, the number of days the Department considers the owner in violation, and the total amount due. Within 30 days after receipt of a copy of the order issued pursuant to this section, any owner subject to the civil penalty provisions shall have the right to petition the Board, in writing, for a hearing. A timely filed petition shall stay the effect of the penalty notice.

The hearing shall be conducted before the Board or a designated member thereof pursuant to § 2.2-4019. The Board shall affirm, modify, amend, or cancel the penalty notice within 10 days following the conclusion of the hearing. Any owner aggrieved by a decision of the Board after a hearing shall have the right to judicial review of the final Board decision pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

If any civil penalty has not been paid within 45 days after the final Board decision or court order has been served on the violator, the Board shall request the Attorney General to institute a civil action in the court of any county in which the violator resides or has his principal place of business to recover the amount of the assessment.

Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund, established pursuant to §

10.1-603.17

, and shall be used for the administration of the dam safety program, including for the repair and maintenance of dams.

History.

2006, c. 30.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-613.3.
No liability of Board, Department, employees, or agents.

An owner may not bring an action against the Commonwealth, the Board, the Department, or agents or employees of the Commonwealth for the recovery of damages caused by the partial or total failure of a dam or reservoir, or by the operation of a dam or reservoir, or by an act or omission in connection with:

Approval of the construction, alteration, or maintenance of a dam or reservoir, or approval of flood-operations plans during or after construction;

Issuance or enforcement of orders relating to maintenance or operation of the dam or reservoir;

Control or regulation of the dam or reservoir;

Measures taken to protect against failure of the dam or reservoir during an emergency;

Investigations or inspections authorized under this article;

Use of design and construction criteria prepared by the Department; or

Determination of the hazard classification of the dam.

History.

2006, c. 30.

§ 10.1-613.4.
Liability of owner or operator.

Notwithstanding subsection B, nothing in this article, and no order, notice, approval, or advice of the Director or Board shall relieve any owner or operator of an impounding structure from any legal duties, obligations, and liabilities resulting from such ownership or operation. The owner or operator shall be responsible for liability for damage to the property of others or injury to persons, including the loss of life resulting from the operation or failure of an impounding structure. Compliance with this article does not guarantee the safety of an impounding structure or relieve the owner or operator of liability in case of an impounding structure failure.

The owner of the land upon which an impounding structure owned, maintained, or operated by a soil and water conservation district is situated shall not be responsible for liability for damages to the property of others or injury to persons, including the loss of life, resulting from the operation or failure of the impounding structure. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the damages to the property of others or injury to persons is the result of an act or omission of the landowner unrelated to ownership, maintenance, or operation of the impounding structure.

Prior to dissolution or termination of an entity that owns an impounding structure, the entity shall either convey ownership to a third party by deed or other legal conveyance or decommission the impounding structure pursuant to the requirements of the Virginia Impounding Structure Regulations. Prior to conveying ownership, the owner shall notify the Director of such transfer of ownership in accordance with requirements set out in the Virginia Impounding Structure Regulations. Such notice to the Director shall include a warrant by the transferring owner that the transferee is a responsible party capable of discharging all obligations of an impounding structure owner imposed by law and regulations.

The Commonwealth, the Board, or the Department shall not be deemed to become an owner of an impounding structure by providing funding or other assistance for maintenance, repair, or decommissioning of an impounding structure owned by another person or entity.

History.

2006, c. 30; 2014, cc. 146, 304, 593.

Cross references.

As to payments by developer or subdivider of costs associated with development in dam break inundation zones, see §

15.2-2243.1

.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 146 and 304 are identical, and substituted “A. Notwithstanding subsection B, nothing” for “Nothing” and “an impounding” for “a” in the first sentence; deleted “but not limited to,” following “persons, including” in the second sentence; substituted “an impounding structure” for “a dam” once in the second sentence and twice in the third sentence; and added subsection B.

The 2014 amendment by c. 593 designated the existing provision as subsection A, substituted “an impounding” for “such a,” “the loss” for “but not limited to, loss,” “an impounding structure” for “a dam” three times, and inserted “or operator” twice; and added subsections B and C, which were subsequently redesignated as subsections C and D by the Virginia Code Commission.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-613.5.
Program administration fees; establishment of Dam Safety Administrative Fund.

The Board is authorized to establish and collect application fees from any applicant to be deposited into the Dam Safety Administrative Fund established pursuant to subsection B. Permit applications shall not be reviewed without a full payment of the required fee. Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Districts shall be exempt from all fees established pursuant to this section.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Dam Safety Administrative Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of permit application fees authorized under subsection A and shall be used for the administration of the dam safety program, including actions taken in accordance with §§

10.1-608

,

10.1-609

, and

10.1-613

. All such funds shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

2006, c. 30; 2010, c. 13.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 475 and 489, cl. 1, effective April 1, 2014, provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Conservation and Recreation, on behalf of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, shall utilize a storm-based approach in order to derive the Probable Maximum Precipitation (PMP) for locations within or affecting the Commonwealth. The PMP revisions shall be based on accepted storm evaluation techniques and take into account such factors as basin characteristics that affect the occurrence and location of storms and precipitation, regional and basin terrain influences, available atmospheric moisture, and seasonality of storm types. The results shall be considered by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board in its decision to authorize the use of the updated PMP values in Probable Maximum Flood calculations, thus replacing the current PMP values. Such PMP revisions shall be adopted by the Board if it finds that the analysis is valid and reliable and will result in cost savings to owners for impounding structure spillway construction or rehabilitation efforts.

“§ 2. The development of the methodology shall be completed by December 1, 2015.

“§ 3. Owners of impounding structures with spillway design inadequacies who maintain coverage under a Conditional Operation and Maintenance Certificate in accordance with the Board’s Impounding Structure Regulations (4VAC50-20) shall not be required to rehabilitate the spillway of their impounding structure until the analysis required under § 1 has been completed and reviewed by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board. Such owners shall remain subject to all other requirements of the Dam Safety Act (§

10.1-604

et seq.) and regulations.”

Acts 2014, cc. 475 and 489, cl. 2, effective April 1, 2014, provides: “That in addition to other sums made available, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is authorized to utilize up to $500,000 in unobligated balances in the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-603.17

of the Code of Virginia or the Dam Safety Administrative Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-613.5

of the Code of Virginia to contract out for the analysis required under § 1.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 13 designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and rewrote the first sentence; and added subsection B.

§ 10.1-613.6.
Negotiated settlement agreements.

With the consent of any owner of an impounding structure who has allegedly violated or failed, neglected, or refused to obey any regulation or order of the Board, any condition of a permit, or any provision of this chapter, the Board may enter into a negotiated settlement agreement with such owner, so long as the impounding structure or dam is not subject to the provisions of §

10.1-609

, to correct deficiencies at the structure according to the schedule of implementation appended to the negotiated settlement agreement and for the payment of civil charges for past alleged violations in specific sums not to exceed the limit specified in §

10.1-613.2

. Such civil charges shall be suspended upon compliance with the terms and conditions of the negotiated settlement agreement as determined by the Director. Such civil charges shall be instead of any appropriate civil penalty that could be imposed under §

10.1-613.2

and shall be paid into the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund established by Article 1.2 (§

10.1-603.16

et seq.).

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 97.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.